Hawaii statutes.
[§11-121] Ballot images. A voter shall
not be prohibited from distributing or sharing an electronic or digital image
of the voter's own marked ballot via social media or other means regardless of
how the voter acquired the image; provided that this section shall not be a
defense for any election offenses under chapter 19 or related offenses under
the Penal Code. [L 2016, c 81, §1]

Cross References

Ballot removal or exhibition; prohibition, see §11-137.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next